Washington statutes.
RCW 19.190.110

Intent—Preemption of local laws.

It is the intent of the legislature that this chapter is a matter of statewide concern. This chapter supersedes and preempts all rules, regulations, codes, ordinances, and other laws adopted by a city, county, city and county, municipality, or local agency regarding the practices covered by this chapter and notices to consumers from computer software providers regarding information collection.

[ 2005 c 378 s 5.]

NOTES:

Severability—2005 c 378: See note following RCW 19.190.080.